California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Any person who removes, alters, or obfuscates any vehicle identification number or other unique marking that has been added to a catalytic converter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who knowingly possesses three or more catalytic converters that have the vehicle identification number or other unique marking removed, altered, or obfuscated is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) This subdivision does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any
 person who is removing, altering, or obfuscating a vehicle identification number or other unique marking in order to apply a new vehicle identification number or unique marking because the catalytic converter is being lawfully installed on a different vehicle.

(2) Any person that is disassembling, smelting, or otherwise permanently destroying a catalytic converter lawfully in their possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 847, Sec. 1.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Motor Vehicle Chop Shops [10801. - 10804.]

10801.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally owns or operates a chop shop is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by up to one year in the county jail, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 603.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10802.

Any person who knowingly alters, counterfeits, defaces, destroys, disguises, falsifies, forges, obliterates, or removes vehicle identification numbers, with the intent to misrepresent the identity or prevent the identification of motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts, for the purpose of sale, transfer, import, or export, is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, or by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by up to one year in the county jail, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and
 imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 604.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10803.

(a) Any person who buys with the intent to resell, disposes of, sells, or transfers, more than one motor vehicle or parts from more than one motor vehicle, with the knowledge that the vehicle identification numbers of the motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts have been altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated, or removed for the purpose of misrepresenting the identity or preventing the identification of the motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts, is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, four, or six years, or by a fine of not more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), or by both the fine
 and imprisonment, or by up to one year in the county jail, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who possesses, for the purpose of sale, transfer, import, or export, more than one motor vehicle or parts from more than one motor vehicle, with the knowledge that the vehicle identification numbers of the motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts have been altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated, or removed for the purpose of misrepresenting the identity or preventing the identification of the motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts, is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, or by a fine of not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by
 imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 605.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10804.

(a) Section 10803 does not apply to a motor vehicle scrap processor who, in the normal legal course of business and in good faith, processes a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part by crushing, compacting, or other similar methods, if any vehicle identification number is not removed from the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part prior to or during the processing.

(b) Section 10803 does not apply to any owner or authorized possessor of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part which has been recovered by law enforcement authorities after having been stolen or if the condition of the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part is known to, or has been reported to, law enforcement authorities. Law enforcement authorities are presumed to have knowledge of all vehicle identification numbers on a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part which are altered, counterfeited, defaced, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated, or removed, when law enforcement authorities deliver or return the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part to its owner or an authorized possessor after it has been recovered by law enforcement authorities after having been reported stolen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   Effective September 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Theft and Injury of Vehicles [10850. - 10856.]

10850.

The provisions of this chapter apply to vehicles upon the highways and elsewhere throughout the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

(a) Any person who drives or takes a vehicle not his or her own, without the consent of the owner thereof, and with intent either to permanently or temporarily deprive the owner thereof of his or her title to or possession of the vehicle, whether with or without intent to steal the vehicle, or any person who is a party or an accessory to or an accomplice in the driving or unauthorized taking or stealing, is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) If the vehicle is (1) an ambulance, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 165, (2) a distinctively marked vehicle of a law enforcement agency or fire department, taken while the ambulance or vehicle is on an emergency call and this fact is known to the person driving or taking, or any person who is party or an accessory to or an accomplice in the driving or unauthorized taking or stealing, or (3) a vehicle which has been modified for the use of a disabled veteran or any other disabled person and which displays a distinguishing license plate or placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.5 or 22511.9 and this fact is known or should reasonably have been known to the person driving or taking, or any person who is party or an accessory in the driving or unauthorized taking or stealing, the offense is a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years or by a fine of not
 more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) In any prosecution for a violation of subdivision (a) or (b), the consent of the owner of a vehicle to its taking or driving shall not in any case be presumed or implied because of the owner’s consent on a previous occasion to the taking or driving of the vehicle by the same or a different person.

(d) The existence of any fact which makes subdivision (b) applicable shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(e) Any person who has been convicted of one or more previous felony violations of this
 section, or felony grand theft of a vehicle in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 487 of the Penal Code, former subdivision (3) of Section 487 of the Penal Code, as that section read prior to being amended by Section 4 of Chapter 1125 of the Statutes of 1993, or Section 487h of the Penal Code, is punishable as set forth in Section 666.5 of the Penal Code. The existence of any fact that would bring a person under Section 666.5 of the Penal Code shall be alleged in the information or indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 606.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Note: The operative date in subd. (f) originated in, and relates to, a prior version.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.5.

Any person who takes binder chains, required under regulations adopted pursuant to Section 31510, having a value of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less which chains are not his own, without the consent of the owner thereof, and with intent either permanently or temporarily to deprive the owner thereof of his title to or possession of the binder chains whether with or without intent to steal the same, or any person who is a party or accessory to or an accomplice in the unauthorized taking or stealing is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than
 six months or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both such fine and imprisonment. The consent of the owner of the binder chain to its taking shall not in any case be presumed or implied because of such owner’s consent on a previous occasion to the taking of the binder chain by the same or a different person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 54.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.

No person shall either individually or in association with one or more other persons, wilfully injure or tamper with any vehicle or the contents thereof or break or remove any part of a vehicle without the consent of the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.5.

(a) No person shall purchase a used catalytic converter, including for the purpose of dismantling, recycling, or smelting, except from any of the following:

(1) An automobile dismantler licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5.

(2) A core recycler, as defined in Section 21610 of the Business and Professions Code, that maintains a fixed place of business and has obtained the catalytic converter pursuant to that section.

(3) A motor vehicle manufacturer, dealer, or lessor-retailer licensed pursuant to Division 5
 (commencing with Section 11100).

(4) An automotive repair dealer licensed pursuant to Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) Any other licensed business that may reasonably generate, possess, or sell used catalytic converters.

(6) An individual possessing documentation that they are the lawful owner of the used catalytic converter, including, but not limited to, a certificate of title or registration that identifies the individual as the legal or registered owner of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was detached, and that includes a vehicle identification number that matches the vehicle identification number permanently marked on the catalytic
 converter.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Permanently marked” means prominently engraved, etched, welded, metal stamped, acid marked, or otherwise permanently displayed using a similarly reliable method of imparting a lasting mark on the exterior case of the catalytic converter.

(2) “Used catalytic converter” means a catalytic converter that has been previously installed on a vehicle and has been detached. It does not include a reconditioned or refurbished catalytic converter being sold at retail.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable as an infraction by a fine, as follows:

(1) For a first offense, by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) For a second offense, by a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(3) For a third or subsequent offense, by a fine of four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

No person shall with intent to commit any malicious mischief, injury, or other crime, climb into or upon a vehicle whether it is in motion or at rest, nor shall any person attempt to manipulate any of the levers, starting mechanism, brakes, or other mechanism or device of a vehicle while the same is at rest and unattended, nor shall any person set in motion any vehicle while the same is at rest and unattended.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10854.

Every person having the storage, care, safe-keeping, custody, or possession of any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code who, without the consent of the owner, takes, hires, runs, drives, or uses the vehicle or who takes or removes any part thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not exceeding one year or by both.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10855.

(a) If a person who has leased or rented a vehicle willfully and intentionally fails to return the vehicle to its owner within five days after the lease or rental agreement has expired, the person shall be presumed to have embezzled the vehicle.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 609, Sec. 4.   (AB 391)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10856.

(a) A person shall not interfere with the transport of a vehicle to a storage facility, auction, or dealer by an individual who is employed by a repossession agency or who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code once repossession is complete as provided in Section 7507.12 of the Business and Professions Code. This subdivision shall not apply to a peace officer while acting in an official capacity.

(b) Any tow yard, impounding agency, or governmental agency, or any person acting on behalf of those entities, shall not refuse to release a vehicle or other collateral to anyone that is legally entitled to that vehicle or other
 collateral. This subdivision shall not apply to a vehicle being held for evidence by law enforcement or a prosecuting attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 390, Sec. 11.   (AB 2503)   Effective September 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention [10900. - 10904.]

10900.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1248, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.

(a) Pursuant to Section 1872.8 of the Insurance Code, proceeds from the assessment imposed thereunder shall be used to fund prevention and increased investigation of economic automobile theft. Funds received pursuant to Section 1872.8 shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account and appropriated to the Department of the California Highway Patrol for prevention and enhanced investigative efforts to deter economic automobile theft.

(b) Moneys received by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be used to fund (1) enhanced programs to prevent and investigate economic automobile theft; (2) a program directed at investigating and interdicting the export of stolen motor vehicles and stolen motor vehicle components across an international border; and (3) to operate the CAL H.E.A.T (Californians Help Eliminate Auto Theft) program. Moneys received by a local law enforcement agency pursuant to this section shall be used to fund enhanced programs to prevent and investigate economic automobile theft and shall not be used to supplant or replace funding of existing personnel or equipment.

The commissioner shall submit an annual report to the Legislature, no later than 90 days following the completion of the fiscal year, accounting for all funds received and disbursed pursuant to this section. The report shall detail (A) the uses to which those funds were put, including payment of salaries and expenses, purchase of equipment and supplies, and other expenditures by type; and (B) results achieved as a consequence of expenditures made, including the number of investigations, arrests, complaints filed, convictions, and the number of vehicles recovered and amounts of property losses saved.

(c) As used in this section, “economic automobile theft” means automobile theft perpetrated for financial gain, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Theft of a motor vehicle for financial gain.

(2) Reporting that a motor vehicle has been stolen for the purpose of filing a false insurance claim.

(3) Engaging in any act prohibited by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 10801) of Division 4 this code.

(4) Switching of vehicle identification numbers to obtain title to a stolen motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1248, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall establish a program entitled “CAL H.E.A.T.” (Help Eliminate Auto Theft) for the purpose of reducing the incidence of economic auto theft in California. The program shall be an anti-auto theft program with a toll-free telephone hotline operator funded by the department using funds distributed to it pursuant to Section 10901. The hotline operator shall channel reports from the public regarding auto thefts to state and local law enforcement agencies. In the annual report, the commissioner shall report on the results of this program, including the number of calls from the public reporting a suspected motor vehicle theft, the number of arrests, complaints filed, convictions, and vehicles recovered, and the amount of property losses saved as a result of the program.

If funded by admitted insurers in this state, the program may offer rewards for reports that lead to the arrest and conviction of a person engaged in economic automobile theft. If so funded, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall establish a claims board, which shall include appointments from state and local law enforcement agencies and the insurance industry, to determine the amount of individual awards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1248, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10904.

The commissioner may develop a public education campaign to deter participation in auto insurance fraud and to encourage reporting of fraudulent claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING AND BUSINESS REGULATIONS [11100. - 12217.]



CHAPTER 1. Driving Schools and Driving Instructors [11100. - 11114.]

11100.

(a) No person shall own or operate a driving school or give driving instruction for compensation, unless a license therefor has been secured from the department.

(b) This section does not apply to the ownership or operation of any school, or the giving of instruction, for the driving of motortrucks of three or more axles which are more than 6,000 pounds unladen weight.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1399, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11100.1.

No person who instructs others in the operation of all-terrain vehicles shall represent that the instruction given satisfies the requirements of Sections 38503 and 38504, and no certificate shall be issued or awarded for participation in all-terrain vehicle safety instruction unless the instruction is conducted by a licensed all-terrain vehicle safety instructor who is sponsored by an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 4.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11100.5.

Whenever it is necessary for a driving school or independent driving instructor to be certified by the Department of Education, or any agency thereof, in order to participate in any state or federal program directed at training or retraining persons in occupational skills, licensing or certification by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to this chapter may operate to fully qualify such school or instructor to participate in the program.

Costs incurred by the department in exercising its functions pursuant to this section shall be borne by the applicant for licensing or certification, and the department may charge the applicant a reasonable fee therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1957.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Public schools or educational institutions in which driving instruction is part of the curriculum.

(2) Nonprofit public service organizations offering instruction without a tuition fee.

(3) Nonprofit organizations engaged exclusively in giving off-the-highway instruction in the operation of motorcycles, if the course of instruction is approved by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration and is not designed to prepare students for examination by the department for an M1 or M2 drivers license or endorsement.

(4) Commercial schools giving only off-the-highway instruction in the operation of special construction equipment, as defined in this code.

(5) Vehicle dealers or their salesmen giving instruction without charge to purchasers of motor vehicles.

(6) Employers giving instruction to their employees.

(7) Commercial schools engaged exclusively in giving off-the-highway instruction in the operation of racing vehicles or in advanced driving skills to persons holding valid drivers’ licenses, except whenever that instruction is given to persons who are being prepared for examination by the department for any class of driver’s license.

(b) For purposes of this section, “racing vehicle” means a motor vehicle of a type that is used exclusively in a contest of speed and that is not intended for use on the highways.

(c) (1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to direct or restrict courses of instruction in driver education offered by private secondary schools or to require the use of credentialed or certified instructors in driver education courses offered by private secondary schools.

(2) For the purposes of this section, private secondary schools are those subject to Sections 33190 and 48222 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 311, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

(a) A driving school owner, or the principal in an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization, shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Maintain an established place of business open to the public. No office or place of business shall be situated within 500 feet of any building used by the department as an office, unless the owner was established at that location on or before January 1, 1976.

(2) Have the proper equipment necessary to give instruction in the operation of the class of vehicles for which the course is designed, which shall include, but not be limited to, training vehicles equipped with all of the following:

(A) An additional functional foot brake affixed to the right side of the front floor.

(B) A rearview mirror placed on the inside of the windshield on the right side, which is additional to the factory-installed mirror in the center of the windshield.

(3) Procure and file with the department a bond of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) executed by an admitted surety insurer and conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud or make any fraudulent representation that will cause a monetary loss to a person taking instruction from the applicant.

(4) Meet the requirements of Section 11105.2 and, if the person is the owner of a driving school, meet the requirements of Section 11102.5. If the owner is not the operator of the driving school, the owner shall designate an operator who shall meet the requirements of Section 11102.5.

(5) (A) File with the department an instrument, in writing, appointing the director as the agent of the applicant upon whom a process may be served in any action commenced against the applicant arising out of any claim for damages suffered by any person by the applicant’s violation of any provision of this code or any condition of the bond.

(B) The applicant shall stipulate in the instrument that any process directed to the applicant, when personal service cannot be made in this state after due diligence, may be served upon the director or, if the director is absent from the office, upon any employee in charge of the office of the director, in which case the service is of the same effect as if served upon the applicant personally. The applicant shall further stipulate, in writing, that the agency created by the instrument shall continue during the period covered by the license and so long thereafter as the applicant may be made to answer in damages for a violation of this code or any condition of the bond.

(C) The instrument appointing the director as agent for the applicant for service of process shall be acknowledged by the applicant before a notary public.

(D) If the licensee is served with process by service upon the director, one copy of the summons and complaint shall be left with the director or in the director’s office in Sacramento or mailed to the office of the director in Sacramento. A fee of five dollars ($5) shall also be paid to the director at the time of service of the copy of the summons and complaint.

(E) The service on the director is a sufficient service on the licensee if the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney also, on the same day, sends notice of the service and a copy of the summons and complaint by registered mail to the licensee. A copy of the summons and complaint shall also be mailed by the plaintiff or his or her attorney to the surety of the applicant’s bond at the address of the surety given in the bond, postpaid and registered with request for return receipt.

(F) The director shall keep a record of all process served upon the director under this paragraph showing the day and hour of service, and the director shall retain the summons and complaint served on file.

(G) If the licensee is served with process by service thereof upon the director, the licensee has 30 days after that service within which to answer any complaint or other pleading filed in the cause. For purposes of venue, if the licensee is served with process by service upon the director, the service is deemed to have been made upon the licensee in the county in which the licensee has or last had the licensee’s established place of business.

(b) The qualifying requirements referred to in this section shall be met within one year from the date of application for a license, or a new application, examination, and a fee shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.1.

If a deposit is given instead of the bond required by Section 11102:

(a) The director may order the deposit returned at the expiration of three years from the date a driving school licensee has ceased to do business, or three years from the date a licensee has ceased to be licensed, if the director is satisfied that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(b) If either the director, department, or state is a defendant in any action instituted to recover all or any part of the deposit, or any action is instituted by the director, department, or state to determine those entitled to any part of the deposit, the director, department, or state shall be paid reasonable attorney fees and costs from the deposit. Costs shall include those administrative costs incurred in processing claims against the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 597.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.5.

(a) A driving school operator shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Within three attempts, pass an examination that the department requires on traffic laws, safe driving practices, operation of motor vehicles, teaching methods and techniques, driving school statutes and regulations, and office procedures and recordkeeping.

(2) Pay the department a fee of one hundred dollars ($100), which shall entitle the applicant to three examinations.

(3) Be 21 years of age or older.

(4) Have worked for an established licensed California driving school as a driving instructor for a period of not less than 2,000 hours of actual behind-the-wheel teaching and, on and after July 1, 1973, have satisfactorily completed a course in the teaching of driver education and driver training acceptable to the department, except that the operator, including an owner who is also the operator, of a driving school that exclusively teaches motorcycle driving may, in lieu of the behind-the-wheel teaching requirement, have worked for an established licensed California driving school as a motorcycle driving instructor for not less than 300 hours of actual motorcycle range and street teaching, have taught 300 hours of actual motorcycle range and street instruction under the guidance of the California Motorcyclist Safety Program, or have given comparable training instruction that is acceptable to
 the department. This paragraph does not apply to any person who is certified by the State Department of Education as fully qualified to teach driver education and driver training and has taught those subjects in the public school system for not less than 1,000 hours.

(b) The qualifying requirements referred to in this section shall be met within one year from the date of application for a license, or a new application, examination, and a fee shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 8.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11102.5, a driving school operator who is first licensed to operate a driving school on or after July 1, 2016, and who offers no behind-the-wheel driver training, shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Within three attempts, pass an examination that the department requires on traffic laws, safe driving practices, operation of motor vehicles, teaching methods and techniques, driving school statutes and regulations, and office procedures and recordkeeping.

(2) Pay the department a fee for each examination taken, not to exceed the reasonable cost of administering the examination.

(3) Be 21 years of
 age or older.

(4) Have successfully completed an educational program of not less than 60 hours that is acceptable to the department. The program shall include a minimum of 40 hours of classroom instruction and 20 hours of behind-the-wheel instruction. The program shall include, but not be limited to, driving school operator responsibilities, current vehicle laws, and regulations in Article 4.6 of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. The instruction may be provided by generally accredited educational institutions, private vocational schools, and education programs and seminars offered by professional societies, organizations, trade associations, and other educational and technical programs that meet the requirements of this section.

(b) The qualifying requirements referred to in this section shall be met within one year from the date of
 application for a license, or a new application, examination, and a fee for the examination not to exceed the reasonable cost of administering the examination shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 300.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

A driving school owner and an independent instructor licensed under Section 11105.5 shall maintain bodily injury and property damage liability insurance on motor vehicles while being used in driving instruction, insuring the liability of the driving school, the driving instructor, and any person taking instruction in at least the following amounts: one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit for one person, three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for damage to property of others in any one accident.

The owner or instructor shall file evidence of that insurance coverage in the form of a certificate from the insurance carrier with the department, and the certificate shall stipulate that the insurance shall not be canceled except upon 30 days’ prior written notice to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.1.

An all-terrain vehicle safety training organization shall maintain bodily injury and property damage liability insurance on motor vehicles while being used in all-terrain vehicle safety instruction, insuring the liability of the organization, the instructors, and any person taking instruction in at least the following amounts:

(a) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident.

(b) Subject to the limit specified in paragraph (1) for one person, three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident.

(c) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for damage to property of others in any one accident.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 7.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.2.

A driving school owner who employs one or more driving instructors or other employees shall sign, under penalty of perjury, a statement in a form determined and retained by the department stating that the owner is in compliance with worker’s compensation requirements set forth in Section 3700 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

(a) Every person, in order to qualify as a driving instructor, as defined in Section 310.4, shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) On and after July 1, 1973, have a high school education or its equivalent and have satisfactorily completed a course in the teaching of driver education and driver training acceptable to the department.

(2) Within three attempts, pass an examination that the department requires on traffic laws, safe driving practices, operation of motor vehicles, and teaching methods and techniques.

(3) Be physically able to safely operate a motor vehicle and to train others in the operation of motor vehicles.

(4) Hold a valid California driver’s license in a class appropriate for the type of vehicle in which instruction will be given.

(5) Not be on probation to the department as a negligent operator.

(6) Have a driving record that does not have an outstanding notice for violating a written promise to appear in court or for willfully failing to pay a lawfully imposed fine, as provided in former Section 40509.

(7) Be 21 years of age or older.

(b) If an applicant cannot meet the requirements of paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) because of a physical disability, the department may, at its discretion, issue the applicant a driving school instructor’s license restricted to classroom driver education instruction only.

(c) The qualifying requirements referred to in this section shall be met within one year from the date of application for a license, or a new application, examination, and a fee shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 5.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.3.

(a) An all-terrain vehicle safety instructor shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be a person who has not been convicted of a crime involving an act of dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to benefit themself or another substantially, or to injure another substantially; or has not committed any act that, if done as an all-terrain vehicle safety instructor, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the all-terrain vehicle safety instructor’s license. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere shall be deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(2) Have a high school education or its equivalent and have satisfactorily completed a course of instruction training in all-terrain vehicle safety as approved by the Off-Highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee.

(3) Within three attempts, pass the examination that the department requires on off-highway vehicle laws, safe driving practices, operation of all-terrain vehicles, and teaching methods and techniques.

(4) Be physically able to safely operate a motor vehicle and to train others in the operation of all-terrain vehicles.

(5) Hold a valid driver’s license issued by this state or any contiguous state.

(6) Not be on probation to the